Hawaii statutes.
[§432G-2] Establishment of a dental
insurer; certificate of authority. (a) Any person may apply to the
commissioner for a certificate of authority to establish and operate a dental
insurer in compliance with this chapter and chapter 423. No person shall
establish or operate a dental insurer in this State without meeting the
requirements of chapter 423 and obtaining a certificate of authority under this
chapter. A foreign corporation may qualify under this chapter, subject to its
registration to do business in this State in compliance with all provisions of
this chapter and other applicable state laws, including chapter 423.

(b) Any dental service corporation formed and
operating pursuant to chapter 423 as of July 1, 2013, shall submit an
application for a certificate of authority under subsection (c) within ninety
days of July 1, 2013. The applicant may continue to operate until the
commissioner acts upon the application. In the event that an application made
pursuant to this subsection is denied, the applicant shall thereafter be
treated as a dental service corporation whose charter of incorporation has been
revoked.

(c) Each application for a certificate of
authority shall be verified by an officer or authorized representative of the
applicant, shall be in a form prescribed by the commissioner, and shall set
forth or be accompanied by the following:

(1) A copy of the organizational documents of the
applicant, such as the articles of incorporation, articles of association,
partnership agreement, trust agreement, or other applicable documents, and all
amendments thereto;

(2) A copy of the bylaws, rules and regulations, or
similar document, if any, regulating the conduct of the internal affairs of the
applicant;

(3) A list of the names, addresses, official
positions, and biographical information on forms acceptable to the commissioner
of the persons who are to be responsible for the conduct of the affairs and
day-to-day operations of the applicant, including all members of the board of
directors, board of trustees, executive committee or other governing board or
committee, and the principal officers in the case of a corporation, or the
partners or members in the case of a partnership or association;

(4) A copy of any contract form made or to be made
between any class of providers and the applicant and a copy of any contract
made or to be made between third party administrators, marketing consultants,
or persons listed in paragraph (3) and the applicant;

(5) A copy of the form of evidence of coverage to be
issued to the enrollees;

(6) A copy of the form of group contract, if any,
which is to be issued to employers, unions, trustees, or other organizations;

(7) Financial statements showing the applicant's
assets, liabilities, and sources of financial support, and both a copy of the
applicant's most recent audited financial statement and an unaudited current
financial statement;

(8) A financial feasibility plan which includes
detailed enrollment projections, the methodology for determining premium rates
to be charged during the first twelve months of operations certified by an
actuary or other qualified person, a projection of balance sheets, cash flow
statements showing any capital expenditures, purchase and sale of investments,
deposits with the State, income and expense statements anticipated from the
start of operations until the organization has had net income for at least one
year, and a statement as to the sources of working capital as well as any other
sources of funding;

(9) A power of attorney duly executed by the
applicant, if not domiciled in this State, appointing the commissioner and the
commissioner's successors in office, and duly authorized deputies, as the true
and lawful attorney of the applicant in and for this State upon whom all lawful
process in any legal action or proceeding against the applicant on a cause of
action arising in this State may be served;

(10) A statement or map reasonably describing the
geographic area or areas to be served;

(11) A description of the internal grievance
procedures to be utilized for the investigation and resolution of enrollee
complaints and grievances;

(12) A description of the proposed quality assurance
program, including the formal organizational structure, methods for developing
criteria, procedures for comprehensive evaluation of the quality of care
rendered to enrollees, and processes to initiate corrective action and
reevaluation when deficiencies in provider or organizational performance are
identified;

(13) A description of the procedures to be implemented
to meet the protection against insolvency requirements in section 432G‑6;

(14) A list of the names, addresses, and license
numbers of all providers or groups of providers with which the applicant has
agreements; and

(15) Such other information as the commissioner may
require.

(d) If the commissioner finds that the
applicant has met the requirements for and is fully entitled thereto under the
applicable insurance laws, the commissioner shall issue an appropriate
certificate of authority to the applicant. If the commissioner does not so
find, the commissioner shall deny the applicant the certificate of authority
within a reasonable length of time following filing of the completed
application by the applicant. A certificate of authority shall be denied only
after the commissioner complies with the requirements of section 432G‑13.
[L 2013, c 191, pt of §1]

Revision Note

Subsection (e) to this section enacted by L 2013, c 191, §1
is redesignated as §432G-22 pursuant to §23G-15.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next